Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3415
Scope of practice.

The scope of practice of a genetic counselor
is:

(1) Obtaining and evaluating
individual, family, and medical histories to determine genetic risk for genetic
or medical conditions and diseases in a patient, his or her offspring, and
other family members;

(2)
Discussing features, natural history, means of diagnosis, genetic and environmental
factors, and management of risk for genetic or medical conditions and diseases;

(3) Identifying and coordinating
of genetic laboratory tests and other diagnostic studies as appropriate for
the genetic assessment;

(4)
Integrating genetic laboratory test results and other diagnostic studies with
personal and family medical history to assess and communicate risk factors
for genetic or medical conditions and diseases;

(5) Explaining the clinical implications
of genetic laboratory tests and other diagnostic studies and their results;

(6) Evaluating the client's
or family's responses to genetic or medical conditions identified by the genetic
assessment or risk of recurrence and providing client-centered counseling
and anticipatory guidance;

(7)
Identifying and utilizing community resources that provide medical, educational,
financial, and psychosocial support and advocacy; and

(8) Providing written documentation
of medical, genetic, and counseling information for families and health care
professionals.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 15.